District of Columbia statutes.
47-1310

Duties of Assessor — Furnishment of information.

The Assessor of the District of Columbia shall furnish information with respect to taxes, special assessments, and valuations to any person having any interest in the property with respect to which such information is requested.

Feb. 28, 1898, 30 Stat. 252, ch. 32, § 8
July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 635, ch. 1358, § 1(8)
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1201, ch. 702, § 8
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Office of Assessor abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-413.
1973 Ed., § 47-1009.
1981 Ed., § 47-1310.